Utah statutes.
17-36-40.   Notice that audit complete.
(1)  Within ten days after the receipt of the audit report furnished by the
independent auditor, the county auditor shall prepare and publish a notice to
the public that the county audit is complete:
(a)  at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county;
and
(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(2)  A copy of the county audit may be inspected at the office of the county
auditor.
